California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 (3) (A) An on-sale licensee operating at a venue where live artistic, concert, musical, film screening, food, beverage, culinary, lifestyle, or other cultural events are performed pursuant to a sponsorship or where advertising space or time is purchased shall serve other brands of beer, distilled spirits, and wine distributed by a competing wholesaler in addition to any brand manufactured or distributed by the sponsoring or advertising beer manufacturer, holder
 of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of any importer’s license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of any rectifier’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(B) An on-sale retail licensee owned by the for-profit cemetery shall serve other brands of beer, distilled spirits, and wine distributed by a competing wholesaler in addition to any brand manufactured or distributed by the sponsoring or advertising beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of any importer’s license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of any rectifier’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(4) Advertising space or time purchased shall not be placed in an on-sale licensed premises, other than where the cultural event will take place, where the on-sale retail licensee is also owned directly or indirectly by the
 operator of the for-profit cemetery, or any of its subsidiaries.

(5) An agreement for the sponsorship of, or for the purchase of advertising space and time during, a live artistic, concert, musical, film screening, food, beverage, culinary, lifestyle, or other cultural event shall not be conditioned directly or indirectly, in any way, on the purchase, sale, or distribution of any alcoholic beverage manufactured or distributed by the advertising or sponsoring beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of any importer’s license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of any rectifier’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent by the for-profit cemetery.

(b) A sponsorship of events or purchase of advertising space or time conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the beer
 manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of any importer’s license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of any rectifier’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent and the for-profit cemetery operator.

(c) A beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of any importer’s license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of any rectifier’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000),
 or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) A on-sale retail licensee who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of any importer’s license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of any rectifier’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent to purchase advertising time or space pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license suspension or revocation pursuant to Section
 24200.

(e) Nothing in this section shall authorize a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of any importer’s license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of any rectifier’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent to furnish, give, or lend anything of value to an on-sale retail licensee described in subdivision (a) except as expressly authorized by this section or a provision of this division.

(f) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes a holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, a holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or a holder of a beer and wine importer’s license that does not also hold a wholesaler or retail license as an additional license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.7.

A winegrower, beer manufacturer, or beer and wine wholesaler may serve food and alcoholic beverages to any person, including a person licensed under this division and his or her employees and representatives, who is attending a meeting held upon or who is visiting the premises of the winegrower, beer manufacturer, or beer and wine wholesaler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 216, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer, the holder of a winegrower’s license, a California winegrower’s agent, a rectifier, a distilled spirits manufacturer, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, an on-sale retail licensee if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The on-sale licensee is the owner of any of the following:

(A) A fully enclosed auditorium or theater with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 6,000 seats, at least 60 percent of the use of which is for plays or musical concerts, not including sporting events.

(B) A motion picture studio facility at which public tours are conducted for at least four million people per year.

(C) A retail, entertainment development adjacent to, and under common ownership with, a theme park, amphitheater, and motion picture production studio.

(D) A theme or amusement park and the adjacent retail, dining, and entertainment area located in the City of Los Angeles, Los Angeles County, or Orange County.

(E) A fully enclosed theater, with box office sales and attendance by the public on a ticketed basis only, with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 6,000 seats, located in Los Angeles County within the area subject to the Los Angeles Sports and Entertainment District Specific Plan adopted by the City of Los Angeles pursuant to ordinance number 174225, as approved on September 6,
 2001.

(2) The advertising space or time is purchased only in connection with one of the following:

(A) In the case of a fully enclosed auditorium or theater, in connection with sponsorship of plays or musical concerts to be held on the premises of the auditorium or theater owned by the on-sale licensee.

(B) In the case of a motion picture studio facility, in connection with sponsorship of the public tours or special events conducted at the studio facility.

(C) In the case of a retail, entertainment development, in connection with sponsorship of public tours or special events conducted at the development.

(D) In the case of a theme or amusement park and the adjacent retail, dining, and
 entertainment area, located in the City of Los Angeles, Los Angeles County, or Orange County, in connection with daily activities and events at the theme or amusement park and the adjacent retail, dining, and entertainment area.

(E) In the case of the fully enclosed theater described in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), in connection with events conducted at the theater.

(3) The on-sale licensee serves other brands of beer distributed by a competing beer wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the beer manufacturer, other brands of wine distributed by a competing wine wholesaler in addition to the brand produced or marketed by the winegrower or California winegrower’s agent, and other brands of distilled spirits distributed by a competing distilled spirits wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the distilled
 spirits manufacturer or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent purchasing the advertising space or time.

(b) Any purchase of advertising space or time conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the beer manufacturer, the holder of the winegrower’s license, the California winegrower’s agent, the rectifier, the distilled spirits manufacturer, or the distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, and the on-sale licensee, which contract shall not in any way involve the holder of a wholesaler’s license.

(c) Any beer manufacturer, rectifier, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, holder of a winegrower’s license, or California winegrower’s agent, who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill those contractual obligations
 entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) Any on-sale retail licensee, as described in subdivision (a), who solicits or coerces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer, rectifier, distilled spirits manufacturer, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, holder of a winegrower’s license, or California winegrower’s agent to purchase advertising space or time pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not
 exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 483, Sec. 2.   (AB 2000)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.85.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, holder of a winegrower’s license, or California winegrower’s agent may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, an on-sale retail licensee, that shall be limited to small notices, plaques, or signs that portray partial or full sponsorship or funding of educational programs, special fundraising and promotional events, improvements in capital projects, and the development of exhibits or facilities, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The on-sale licensee is a zoo or aquarium operated by a nonprofit organization that is accredited by the American Association of Zoological Parks and Aquariums.

(2) The advertising space or time is purchased only in connection with the sponsorship of activities that are held on the premises or grounds owned, leased, or controlled by the on-sale licensee.

(3) The on-sale licensee serves other brands of beer distributed by a competing beer wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the beer manufacturer, other brands of wine distributed by a competing wine wholesaler in addition to the brand produced or marketed by the winegrower or California winegrower’s agent, and other brands of distilled spirits distributed by a competing distilled spirits wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the distilled spirits manufacturer or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent purchasing the advertising space or time.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the purchase of billboards or bench advertisements as “advertising space.”

(c) Any purchase of advertising space or time pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be accomplished by a written contract entered into by the beer manufacturer, the distilled spirits manufacturer, the distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, a holder of the winegrower’s license, or the California winegrower’s agent, and the on-sale licensee. That contract shall not in any way involve the holder of a wholesaler’s license.

(d) Any beer manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, holder of a winegrower’s license, or California winegrower’s agent who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) or (c) is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(e) Any on-sale licensee who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, holder of a winegrower’s license, or a California winegrower’s agent to purchase advertising space or time shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 567, Sec. 12.   Effective October 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.9.

(a) Nothing in this division prohibits a winegrower, a beer and wine wholesaler that also holds an off-sale beer and wine retail license and only sells wine, or the holder of a limited off-sale retail wine license from giving or selling wine, a beer manufacturer from giving or selling beer, a craft distiller, a distilled spirits manufacturer, rectifier, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent from giving or selling distilled spirits, or a distilled spirits wholesaler that also holds a beer and wine wholesaler license or importer general licensee from giving or selling beer, wine, or distilled spirits at prices other than those
 contained in schedules filed with the department, to any of the following:

(1) A nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from payment of income taxes under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) A nonprofit incorporated trade association that is exempt from payment of income taxes under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the members of which trade association are licensed under this division. However, the wine, beer, and distilled spirits shall be used solely for a convention or meeting of the nonprofit incorporated trade association.

(3) A nonprofit corporation or association that is exempt from payment of income taxes under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States and is defined as a tax exempt organization under Section 23701a, 23701b, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f, 23701g, 23701i, 23701k, 23701l, 23701r, or 23701w of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Wine, beer, and distilled spirits given or sold by a winegrower, beer manufacturer, craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits wholesaler, or importer general licensee pursuant to this subdivision may be furnished only in connection with public service or fundraising activities including picnics, parades, fairs, amateur sporting events, agricultural exhibitions, or similar
 events.

(4) A licensee authorized to donate or sell alcoholic beverages to a nonprofit corporation, organization, or association pursuant to this section may also provide services to and otherwise assist the corporation, organization, or association in connection with an event conducted under a temporary license issued by the department. 

(b) Nothing in this division prohibits a winegrower, a beer and wine wholesaler that also holds an off-sale beer and wine retail license and only sells wine, or the holder of a limited off-sale retail wine license from giving or selling wine, a beer manufacturer from giving or selling beer, a craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer, rectifier,
 a distilled spirits wholesaler, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent from giving or selling distilled spirits, or a beer and wine wholesaler that also holds an importer’s license from giving or selling beer or wine at prices other than those contained in schedules filed with the department, to any of the following:

(1) A nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from payment of income taxes under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) A nonprofit incorporated trade
 association that is exempt from payment of income taxes under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the members of which trade association are licensed under this division. However, the wine, beer, and distilled spirits shall be used solely for a convention or meeting of the nonprofit incorporated trade association.

(3) A nonprofit corporation or association that is exempt from payment of income taxes under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States and is defined as a tax exempt organization under Section 23701a, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f, or 23701r of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Wine, beer, and distilled spirits given or sold by a winegrower, beer manufacturer, craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent,
 a distilled spirits wholesaler, beer and wine wholesaler, or licensed importer pursuant to this subdivision may be furnished only in connection with public service or fundraising activities including picnics, parades, fairs, amateur sporting events, agricultural exhibitions, or similar events.

(c) A nonprofit corporation, organization, or association that is authorized to purchase or accept donations of alcoholic beverages pursuant to this section, and that also holds a permanent retail license issued pursuant to this division, shall not use any alcoholic beverage so purchased or donated in the exercise of any privileges or business under its permanent retail license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 18, Sec. 1.   (AB 1265)   Effective June 26, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.10.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the department may approve a lease or sublease, or amendments to such lease or sublease, where a manufacturer, manufacturer’s agent, winegrower, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, importer, or wholesaler is the lessor and a retailer is the lessee when each of the following conditions are incorporated in the lease:

(1) The lease is confined to real property and improvements thereon which have become part of the real property.

(2) No trade fixtures or other personal property are included in the lease.

(3) The rent to be paid by the lessee is not less than the current value for such a lease, which the lessor shall establish by submission of competent proof to the department.

(4) The rent is due and payable monthly beginning with the first month of occupancy.

(5) Any money received by the lessor from the lessee when the rent is due shall be first applied by the lessor to the payment of the rent.

(6) The lessee shall purchase from the lessor no more than 10 percent of his yearly supply of the type of alcoholic beverages sold on his licensed premises. The percentage shall be computed on a calendar-year basis.

(b) The original lease and any amendments to the original lease or to an amended lease shall be submitted to the department for its approval.

(c) The department may suspend or revoke the license of the lessor or the lessee for violations of any of the above conditions or for any misrepresentation in the terms of the lease. 

(d) The ownership of shares of stock in a corporation licensed as a retailer under the provisions of this division, when such shares of stock are sold to the general public on any national or local stock exchange, shall not be deemed to be the ownership, either in whole or in part, of the land upon which a retail license issued to such corporation is located. The person who holds such shares of stock shall not be held to be a lessor under the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 699.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.11.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a manufacturer, manufacturer’s agent, winegrower, rectifier, importer, or wholesaler may hold a diminutive amount of stock in a corporate retail licensee or serve on the board of directors of a corporate off-sale retail licensee, provided the stock ownership or service on the board of directors, as determined by the department, does not result in the exercise of control over the retail licensee’s business and does not result in the exclusion of any competitor’s brand of alcoholic beverages, and provided further that the stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange, or NASDAQ, and the department is notified of the stock ownership or service on the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 639, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.12.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a retail licensee may hold a diminutive amount of stock in a corporate licensed manufacturer, manufacturer’s agent, winegrower, rectifier, importer, or wholesaler, provided that the purpose of the stock ownership by the retail licensee, as determined by the department, is not to violate any of the provisions of this chapter, and provided further that the stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange, or on NASDAQ, and the department is notified of the stock ownership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 639, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.13.

(a) In order to alleviate the adverse economic and social consequences of high unemployment in identifiable urban and rural areas of California, the Legislature finds it in the public interest to encourage the private sector to create new employment and job-training opportunities for low-income persons and establish business enterprises owned and managed by such persons. To provide such opportunities it is necessary for companies with sufficient financial resources, management experience and marketing strength to establish as a principal operating objective the creation of definitive programs for obtaining these goals. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a manufacturer, rectifier, distiller, winegrower or bottler of wine who produces and sells only wine in an area outside of the United States, its territories or possessions and outside of foreign countries having common boundaries with any state of the United States, and who is not licensed in the United States, its territories or possessions, or any officer, director or agent of any such person or a person holding the ownership, directly or indirectly, of any interest in any such manufacturer, rectifier, distiller, winegrower or bottler of wine may have an interest in a person holding an on-sale license, provided, that the wine produced or sold by such manufacturer, rectifier, distiller, winegrower or bottler of wine is not sold, furnished or given, directly or indirectly to such on-sale licensee, provided further, that food shall also be sold at the on-sale premises, and, provided further, that any on-sale license that may be granted under this section shall be conditioned so as to promote, where feasible, the following objectives in accordance with the public policy set forth in subdivision (a) above: 

(1) The location of a significant number of on-sale premises in or accessible to areas of high unemployment,

(2) The employment and management training of low-income individuals, particularly those who, because of race, sex, age or national origin, suffer a rate of unemployment significantly higher than the statewide average and

(3) The minority ownership of licensed businesses operating on-sale premises pursuant to a franchise agreement.

The department, after consultation with the Secretary of Business and Transportation, the Department of Business and Economic Development, the Chief of the Division of Fair Employment Practices, and the Director of the Employment Development Department, shall adopt such rules as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1044.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.14.

Notwithstanding any provision of this division, any retail off-sale general licensee who holds at least 30 such licenses in this state and who also operates at least 50 wholesale grocery warehouses not licensed under this division may hold a beer and wine wholesale license in a state with a population not exceeding 700,000, provided that such licensed wholesale operation does not sell or transfer any alcoholic beverages to licensees of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 407.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.15.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a winegrower who manufactures, produces, bottles, processes, imports, or sells wine only, or any officer, director, or agent of that person, may hold the ownership of any interest in any on-sale license, if both of the following conditions exist:

(1) Neither that person, nor any officer, director, or agent of that person, sells or furnishes to the holder of the license any wine, or permits the sale pursuant to that license of any wine, manufactured, produced, wholesaled, bottled, processed, imported, or sold by that person or that person’s principal for as long as that ownership continues.

(2) Neither that person, nor any officer, director, or agent of that person, enters into any collusive scheme, whereby he or she unfairly sells or promotes, in his or her on-sale businesses, the wine of another winegrower who manufactures, produces, bottles, processes, imports, or sells wine only, in return for his or her wine being unfairly sold or promoted in the on-sale businesses of that winegrower.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any licensed winegrower or any winegrower who has a wholesale license, or any officer, director, or agent of that person, may hold, directly or indirectly, the ownership of any interest in an on-sale license, provided that each of the following conditions is met:

(1) The on-sale licensed premises are licensed as a bona fide public eating place as defined in
 Section 23038, or as a bona fide bed and breakfast inn as defined in Section 24045.11.

(2) The on-sale licensed premises purchases all alcoholic beverages sold and served at the on-sale licensed premises only from California wholesale licensees, other than the licensed winegrower who has a wholesale license and an interest in an on-sale license, unless one of the following conditions is met:

(A) The wine purchased is produced or bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the same licensed winegrower that holds an interest in the on-sale license.

(B) The wine is produced or bottled by, and is purchased from, a licensed winegrower who sells no more than 125,000 gallons of wine per year for distribution in this state under all brands or trade names owned by that winegrower.

(C) The wine is purchased by an on-sale licensee in whose on-sale license a licensed winegrower holds an interest, provided that the winegrower sells no more than 125,000 gallons of wine per year for distribution in this state under all brands or trade names owned by that winegrower.

(3) The licensed winegrower and any officer, director, or agent of that person, whether individually or in the aggregate, do not sell and serve the wine products produced or bottled under any brand or trade name owned by that winegrower through more than two on-sale licensed premises in which any of them holds an ownership interest.

(4) The number of wine items by brand offered for sale by the on-sale licensed premises that are produced, bottled, processed, imported, or sold by the licensed winegrower or by any person holding any interest in
 the winegrower does not exceed 15 percent of the total wine items by brand listed and offered for sale in the licensed bona fide public eating place selling and serving that wine. This paragraph does not apply to a bona fide bed and breakfast inn.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed
 accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 296, Sec. 8.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.16.

(a) Nothing in this division shall prohibit the issuance or transfer of any retail on-sale or off-sale license to any person with respect to premises which are an integral part of the operations of a hotel, motel, or marine park owned by, or operated by or on behalf of, the licensee notwithstanding that a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, wholesaler, or out-of-state distilled spirits shipper has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail license, or in the retail licensee, and notwithstanding that the issuance or transfer would otherwise result in a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 25500,
 subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 25501, or Section 25502, if each of the following conditions is met:

(1) In the case of a hotel or motel, the hotel or motel consists of not less than 25 guestroom accommodations.

(2) No more than one-quarter of the total gross annual revenues of the hotel, motel, or marine park is derived from the sale by the hotel, motel, or marine park of alcoholic beverages.

(3) (A) The retail licensee shall purchase no beer or distilled spirits for sale in this state other than from a wholesale licensee, and
 the retail licensee, except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B), shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state from any wholesale licensee that has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail license, or in the retail licensee.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a marine park may purchase beer or malt beverages for sale in this state from a wholesale licensee regardless of whether the wholesale licensee has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail license, or in the retail licensee.

(4) The retail licensee serves other brands of beer, wine, and distilled spirits in addition to the brands manufactured by the beer or distilled spirits manufacturer or produced by the winegrower holding an interest in the
 retail license.

(5) No marine park shall sell or offer for sale any distilled spirits, except during private events or private functions held at the marine park.

(b) For purposes of this section, “hotel” and “motel” shall mean an establishment containing guestroom accommodations with respect to which the predominant relationship existing between the occupants thereof and the owner or operator of the establishment is that of innkeeper and guest; for purposes of this subdivision, the existence of other legal relationships as between some occupants and the owner or operator thereof shall be immaterial.

(c) For purposes of this section, “marine park” means an establishment with not less than 125 contiguous acres, located
 in San Diego County, the predominant purpose of which is the education or entertainment of the public through the display of marine animals and related aquatic, food service, and amusement activities, which holds permits issued by state and federal regulatory agencies authorizing the keeping of marine animals or endangered species or both, and which has an annual paid attendance of at least 2,000,000 people.

(d) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further
 finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests shall be limited to its express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.   (SB 461)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.17.

Nothing in this division shall prohibit the issuance or transfer of any retail onsale general license to any person with respect to premises which are an integral part of the operations of a school for professional chefs owned by, or operated by or on behalf of, the licensee, notwithstanding that a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler holds the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises or in the retail licensee, provided that each of the following conditions is met:

(a) The school is operated in conjunction with a bona fide eating place open to the public.

(b) The school has been in operation in a city with a population of less than one million for at least five years prior to the effective date of this section.

(c) The retail licensee shall purchase no beer or distilled spirits for sale in this state other than from a wholesale licensee, and the retail licensee shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state from any wholesale licensee holding the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises or in the retail licensee.

The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.18.

Nothing in this division shall prohibit the issuance or transfer of any retail offsale beer and wine license to any person with respect to premises which are an integral part of the operations of a school for professional chefs owned by, or operated by or on behalf of, the licensee notwithstanding that a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler holds the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises or in the retail licensee, provided that each of the following conditions is met:

(a) The school is operated in conjunction with a bona fide eating place open to the public.

(b) The school has been in operation in a city with a population of less than one million for at least five years prior to the effective date of this section.

(c) The retail licensee shall purchase no beer or distilled spirits for sale in this state other than from a wholesale licensee, and the retail licensee shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state from any wholesale licensee holding the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises or in the retail licensee.

The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.19.
